Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-204.03
Bingo equipment, defined.

Bingo equipment shall mean all devices, machines, and parts used in and which are an integral part of the conduct of bingo, including, but not limited to, bingo cards, disposable paper bingo cards, bingo balls, bingo blower devices, and computerized accounting systems.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 9;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 3.